District of Columbia statutes.
38-1961

Repealed

Regulation of vacation periods and annual leave.

Repealed.

Mar. 5, 1952, 66 Stat. 14, ch. 81, § 1
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78, § 20, 29 DCR 49
1981 Ed., § 31-1031.
1973 Ed., § 31-698.